Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1814.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin STATEWIDE PUBLIC SAFETY RADIO COMMUNICATION SYSTEM EQUIPMENT GRANTS; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for grants to local units of government, federally recognized Tribal entities, and state agencies participating in the statewide Allied Radio Matrix for Emergency Response (ARMER) public safety radio communication system established under Minnesota Statutes, section 403.36, subdivision 1e. The grants must be used to purchase or upgrade portable radios, mobile radios, and related equipment that is interoperable with the ARMER system. Each local government unit may receive only one grant. Each grant is contingent upon a match of at least five percent from nonstate funds. The director of the Department of Public Safety Emergency Communication Networks Division, in consultation with the Statewide Emergency Communications Board, must administer the grant program. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2028. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end